Missouri, session 2026, HB2625.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 163.021 as enacted by senate bill no. 727, one hundred second
general assembly, second regular session, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 163.021, to read as follows:
163.021. 1. A school district shall receive state aid for its education program only if
it:
(1) Provides for at least a minimum school term as provided in section 171.031.
When the aggregate hours lost in a term due to inclement weather decreases the total hours of
the school term below the required minimum number of hours by more than twelve hours for
all-day students or six hours for one-half-day kindergarten students, all such hours below the
minimum must be made up as provided in section 171.033;
(2) Maintains adequate and accurate records of attendance, personnel and finances, as
required by the state board of education, which shall include the preparation of a financial
statement which shall be submitted to the state board of education the same as required by the
provisions of section 165.111 for districts;
(3) Levies an operating levy for school purposes of not less than one dollar and
twenty-five cents after all adjustments and reductions on each one hundred dollars assessed
valuation of the district; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2625 2
(4) Computes average daily attendance as defined in subdivision (2) of section
163.011 as modified by section 171.031. Whenever there has existed within the district an
infectious disease, contagion, epidemic, plague or similar condition whereby the school
attendance is substantially reduced for an extended period in any school year, the
apportionment of school funds and all other distribution of school moneys shall be made
on the basis of the school year next preceding the year in which such condition existed.
2. (1) For the 2006-07 school year and thereafter, no school district shall receive
more state aid, as calculated under subsections 1 and 2 of section 163.031, for its education
program, exclusive of categorical add-ons, than it received per weighted average daily
attendance for the school year 2005-06 from the foundation formula, line 14, gifted, remedial
reading, exceptional pupil aid, fair share, and free textbook payment amounts, unless it has an
operating levy for school purposes, as determined pursuant to section 163.011, of not less
than:
(a) For school years ending on or before June 30, 2026, two dollars and seventy-
five cents after all adjustments and reductions; and
(b) For the 2026-27 school year and all subsequent school years, one dollar and
fifty cents after all adjustments and reductions.
(2) Any district which is required, pursuant to Article X, Section 22 of the Missouri
Constitution, to reduce its operating levy below the minimum tax rate otherwise required
under this subsection shall not be construed to be in violation of this subsection for making
such tax rate reduction.
(3) Pursuant to Section 10(c) of Article X of the state constitution, a school district
may levy the operating levy for school purposes required by this subsection less all
adjustments required pursuant to Article X, Section 22 of the Missouri Constitution if such
rate does not exceed the highest tax rate in effect subsequent to the 1980 tax year.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to mean that a school district is
guaranteed to receive an amount not less than the amount the school district received per
eligible pupil for the school year 1990-91.
(5) The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any school district located in a
county of the second classification which has a nuclear power plant located in such district or
to any school district located in a county of the third classification which has an electric
power generation unit with a rated generating capacity of more than one hundred fifty
megawatts which is owned or operated or both by a rural electric cooperative except that such
school districts may levy for current school purposes and capital projects an operating levy
not to exceed two dollars and seventy-five cents less all adjustments required pursuant to
Article X, Section 22 of the Missouri Constitution.

HB 2625 3
3. No school district shall receive more state aid, as calculated in section 163.031, for
its education program, exclusive of categorical add-ons, than it received per eligible pupil for
the school year 1993-94, if the state board of education determines that the district was not in
compliance in the preceding school year with the requirements of section 163.172, until such
time as the board determines that the district is again in compliance with the requirements of
section 163.172.
4. No school district shall receive state aid, pursuant to section 163.031, if such
district was not in compliance, during the preceding school year, with the requirement,
established pursuant to section 160.530 to allocate revenue to the professional development
committee of the district.
5. No school district shall receive more state aid, as calculated in subsections 1 and 2
of section 163.031, for its education program, exclusive of categorical add-ons, than it
received per weighted average daily attendance for the school year 2005-06 from the
foundation formula, line 14, gifted, remedial reading, exceptional pupil aid, fair share, and
free textbook payment amounts, if the district did not comply in the preceding school year
with the requirements of subsection 5 of section 163.031.
6. Any school district that levies an operating levy for school purposes that is less
than the performance levy, as such term is defined in section 163.011, shall provide written
notice to the department of elementary and secondary education asserting that the district is
providing an adequate education to the students of such district. If a school district asserts
that it is not providing an adequate education to its students, such inadequacy shall be deemed
to be a result of insufficient local effort. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to
any special district established under sections 162.815 to 162.940.
✔